New York, session 2025-2026, S1929.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 2 of paragraph a of subdivision 4 of section 2 3602 of the education law, as amended by section 10-a of part A of chap- 3 ter 56 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (2) (A) The regional cost index shall reflect an analysis of labor 5 market costs based on median salaries in professional occupations that 6 require similar credentials to those of positions in the education 7 field, but not including those occupations in the education field, 8 provided that the regional cost indices for the two thousand seven--two 9 thousand eight school year [and thereafter] through the two thousand 10 twenty-five--two thousand twenty-six school year shall be as follows: 11 Labor Force Region Index 12 Capital District 1.124 13 Southern Tier 1.045 14 Western New York 1.091 15 Hudson Valley 1.314 16 Long Island/NYC 1.425 17 Finger Lakes 1.141 18 Central New York 1.103 19 Mohawk Valley 1.000 20 North Country 1.000 EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03427-03-6 S. 1929--A 2 1 Provided that in the two thousand twenty-five--two thousand twenty-six 2 school year and thereafter, the regional cost index for Westchester 3 county shall be 1.351. 4 (B) For the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twenty-seven school 5 year and thereafter the regional cost indices shall be as follows: 6 Labor Force Region Index 7 Capital District 1.124 8 Southern Tier 1.045 9 Western New York 1.091 10 Hudson Valley 1.425 11 Long Island/NYC 1.425 12 Finger Lakes 1.141 13 Central New York 1.103 14 Mohawk Valley 1.000 15 North Country 1.000 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.